Vermont, session 2025-2026, S184.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. COMMUNITY JUSTICE CENTER WORKING GROUP
(a) The Community Justice Center Working Group is created for the
purpose of identifying available support services for pretrial diversion and
transitional needs and the mechanisms to make such information available to
courts and other stakeholders and to identify gaps in services in each
community justice center area, including behavioral health services.
VT LEG #386018 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.184
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) The Working Group shall be composed of the following members:
(1) one member from the Community Restorative Justice Center serving
Caledonia County and southern Essex County and two members from other
community justice centers, appointed by the Vermont Community Justice
Network;
(2) the Chief Superior Court Judge or designee;
(3) the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Health or designee;
(5) the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections or designee; and
(6) a member, appointed by the Attorney General.
(c) The Working Group shall present its findings and any recommendations
to the General Assembly not later than December 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386018 v.1